Hawaii, session 2026, HB1973.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that an estimated twenty‑five thousand elderly individuals in Hawaii who require in‑home health care or support services and do not qualify for existing programs, such as medicaid, cannot afford in‑home care services. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a one-year KupunAloha pilot program within the department of health to provide in-home health care and support services for individuals who do not qualify for existing government programs and cannot otherwise afford these services. SECTION 2. (a)  There is established within the department of health a one-year KupunAloha pilot program to provide in-home health care and support services for eligible individuals who do not otherwise qualify for government assistance for these services. (b) In implementing the pilot program, the department shall create a plan of care for each eligible applicant.  The department may refer eligible applicants to health care providers. (c) The pilot program may enter into contracts with health care providers to effectuate the purposes of this Act.  Any contract executed pursuant to this Act shall be subject to chapter 103F, Hawaii Revised Statutes. (d) An individual shall not be considered eligible for the KupunAloha pilot program if: (1)  The individual is covered by medicaid or any other government assistance program for in-home health care  or support services; (2)  The individual does not meet the income requirements for the program established by the department; or (3)  The individual does not meet the need criteria for the program established by the department. (e) The KupunAloha pilot program shall cease to exist on June 30, 2027. SECTION 3. The department of health shall submit a report on the effectiveness of the KupunAloha pilot program established pursuant to this Act to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027.  The report shall also include recommendations to improve the efficiency of the KupunAloha pilot program and whether the program should be made permanent. SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $2,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the implementation and operation of the KupunAloha pilot program. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.